Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2643.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 63VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSKSSec.6301. Definitions.6302. License required.6303. Requirements for license.6304. General requirements.6305. Public education campaign.6306. Authority of department.6307. Suspension, revocation or refusal.12345678910111213141516171819 6308. Penalties.§ 6301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person who applies for a license under this chapter."Branch." A location, other than the principal place of business, where a virtual currency kiosk is located."Commission." The Banking and Securities Commission established under section 1121-A of the act of May 15, 1933 (P.L.565, No.111), known as the Department of Banking and Securities Code."Department." The Department of Banking and Securities of the Commonwealth."Existing customer." A customer transacting at a virtual currency kiosk who has been a customer of the licensee for more than 30 days."Fund." The Virtual Currency Kiosk Public Education Campaign Fund established under section 6305(c) (relating to public education campaign)."Licensee." A person licensed under this chapter."Money." Currency, legal tender or any other product that is generally recognized as a medium of exchange."New customer." A customer transacting at a virtual currency kiosk who has been a customer of the licensee for 30 days or less."NMLS." The Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators 20260HB2643PN3622 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries."Person." An individual, association, joint venture or joint-stock company, partnership, limited partnership, limited partnership association, limited liability company, business corporation, nonprofit corporation or any other group of individuals, however organized."Principal place of business." The primary office of a person at which the person's books, records, accounts and documents are maintained unless otherwise agreed to by the department."Tangible net worth." A person's net worth less intangible assets as determined by generally accepted accounting principles."Virtual currency." As follows:(1) The term includes a digital representation of value that:(i) Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account or store of value.(ii) Is not money, unless the virtual currency was adopted or authorized by a domestic or international government as a medium of exchange, whether denominated in cash.(2) The term does not include:(i) A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or rewards program, value that cannot be taken from or exchanged with the merchant for money, bank credit or virtual currency.(ii) A digital representation of value issued by or 20260HB2643PN3622 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on behalf of a publisher and used solely within an online game, game platform or family of games sold by the same publisher or offered on the same game platform."Virtual currency kiosk." An electronic terminal that enables the exchange of any combination of United States dollars or virtual currency, including by:(1) connecting directly to a separate virtual currency exchange that performs the actual exchange; or(2) drawing upon the virtual currency in the possession of the licensee of the electronic terminal.§ 6302. License required.(a) Requirement.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a person may not operate a virtual currency kiosk without a license from the department.(b) Exception.--A license under subsection (a) shall not be required for banks, bank and trust companies, credit unions, savings banks and trust companies organized under the laws of this Commonwealth or similar banking institutions, credit unions, savings and loan associations, building and loan associations or any subsidiary of an organization under this subsection organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state.(c) Separate license.--A license under this act shall not constitute a license under the act of September 2, 1965 (P.L.490, No.249), known as the Money Transmission and Virtual Currency Transmission Business Licensing Law.§ 6303. Requirements for license.(a) Application contents.--An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form prescribed and provided by the department. All applicants and licensees shall use the NMLS 20260HB2643PN3622 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to obtain and maintain licenses under this chapter. The application shall include the full name of the following:(1) The applicant, if an individual.(2) Each partner, if the applicant is a partnership.(3) Each trustee and officer, if the applicant is a trust.(4) Each officer and director, if the applicant is a corporation, joint stock association or other unincorporated association.(5) Each other business in which the applicant and any affiliated companies are engaged.(b) Additional information.--An applicant shall provide the following:(1) A statement that the applicant will undertake to operate the business honestly, fairly, responsibly and in accordance with this chapter.(2) Policies and procedures to comply with all Federal, State and local law, safeguard and secure information and systems, prevent fraudulent activity and promptly respond to consumer inquiries.(3) A financial statement showing a tangible net worth of at least $500,000, as determined by audited financial statements prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles, and dated within 120 days of application. If the audited financial statement is dated beyond 120 days of the date of application, an interim attested financial statement dated within 90 days of the date of application must be supplemented.(c) Investigation.--Upon receipt of an application for a license, the department may conduct an investigation of the 20260HB2643PN3622 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant or a director, officer, partner, employee, agent or ultimate equitable owner of 10% or more of the applicant as the department deems necessary.(d) Licensing.--All applicants and licensees must establish and maintain a separate license for the principal place of business and each branch.(e) Application fee and bond.--In addition to an application, an applicant shall provide the department with the following:(1) A nonrefundable application fee in the following amounts:(i) Five thousand dollars in the case of a principal place of business.(ii) One thousand dollars in the case of a branch.(2) A bond in the sum of $1,000,000 executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. The bond shall run to the Commonwealth and shall be for the use of the Commonwealth and of any person who may have a cause of action against the licensee for violations of this chapter. The condition of the bond shall be that the licensee shall comply with and abide by the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the department lawfully promulgated under this chapter and that the licensee shall pay to the Commonwealth, to the department or to any other person any money that may become due from the licensee to the Commonwealth or to the department or to any other person under the provisions of this chapter. The bond must remain in effect for at least 31 days following the last virtual currency kiosk transaction at any location. If the department, in its discretion, shall determine the bond 20260HB2643PN3622 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided for in this section is not adequate, the department may require an additional bond in an amount up to the total amount of United States dollar equivalent transactions in this Commonwealth during the 30 days preceding the department's requirement subject to the same conditions and the same right of execution provided for in this section. If a licensee becomes insolvent, the principal sum of the bond shall be applied to the payment in full of claims arising out of the virtual currency exchange transactions in this Commonwealth and any administrative costs incurred and fines imposed by the department.(f) Duty to update.--All applicants and licensees shall be required to provide the department with notice of the change in any information contained in an application for a license or for any renewal of a license within 10 days of an applicant or licensee becoming aware of the change.(g) Issuance of license.--(1) Within 60 days of receipt of a completed application, the department shall either issue a license or refuse to issue a license.(2) The department may refuse to issue a license for failure to meet qualifications required under this chapter.(3) The 60-day time limit required under paragraph (1) may be extended by the department for an additional 30 days if the department determines that the extension is necessary. The department shall provide written notification to any applicant whose application review has been extended and include the final date by which a decision shall be rendered regarding the application.(h) Denial of license for criminal conviction.--The 20260HB2643PN3622 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may deny a license if the applicant, or a director, officer, partner, employee, agent or ultimate equitable owner of 10% or more of the applicant, has been convicted of a crime of moral turpitude or felony in any jurisdiction, or has been convicted of a crime which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would constitute a crime of moral turpitude or felony, at any time during the seven years prior to the license application. For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if the person:(1) has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a criminal charge before a Federal magistrate or domestic, foreign or military court; or(2) has been found guilty by a decision or judgment of a Federal magistrate or domestic, foreign or military court or or by a verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof, unless the plea of guilty or nolo contendere or the decision, judgment or verdict is set aside, vacated, reversed or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process.(i) Denial of license for other reasons.--The department may deny a license or otherwise restrict a license if the department finds that the applicant or a director, officer, partner, employee, agent or ultimate equitable owner of 10% or more of the applicant:(1) has had a license or license application denied, not renewed, suspended or revoked by the department, another Commonwealth licensing agency or any other Federal or State regulatory agency;(2) is the subject of an order of the department or any other regulatory agency;20260HB2643PN3622 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) has violated or failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or any regulation, statement of policy or order of the department;(4) has any outstanding debt to the Commonwealth or any Commonwealth agency; or(5) does not possess the financial responsibility, character, reputation, integrity and general fitness to command confidence of the public to warrant the belief that the virtual currency kiosk will be operated lawfully, honestly, fairly and within the legislative intent of this chapter and in accordance with the general laws of this Commonwealth. For purposes of this paragraph, an applicant is not financially responsible if the applicant has shown a disregard in the management of the applicant's own financial condition. The factors that the department may consider in making a determination regarding an applicant's financial responsibility shall include:(i) current outstanding judgments, other than judgments solely as a result of medical expenses;(ii) current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings;(iii) foreclosures or bankruptcies within the past three years; or(iv) pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three years.(j) Conditional license.--The department may impose conditions on the issuance of a license. If the department determines that conditions imposed upon a licensee have not been fulfilled, the department may take any action authorized under this chapter against the licensee that the department deems 20260HB2643PN3622 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary.(k) Appeal of denial.--If the department refuses to issue a license, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial, the reason for the denial and the applicant's right to appeal the denial. An appeal from the department's refusal to approve an application for a license must be filed by the applicant within 30 days of notice of refusal.(l) Licensee fees.--(1) No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, a licensee shall pay the department $1,000 per kiosk that is located in this Commonwealth and operated by the licensee.(2) Beginning the year after payment under paragraph (1), each year for five years:(i) a licensee shall pay the department $1,000 per kiosk that is in operation by the licensee and located in the Commonwealth; and(ii) $1.00 per transaction for each kiosk that is located in this Commonwealth and operated by the licensee.(3) Fees collected under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be deposited in the fund established under section 6305 (relating to public education campaign).(m) License terms.--A license issued by the department shall be valid until the expiration date on December 31 annually. A license issued by the department shall not be assignable or transferable by operation of law or otherwise.(n) Renewal.--All applications for renewals of licenses shall meet all application requirements in this section and must be filed on NMLS by October 31 annually.20260HB2643PN3622 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6304. General requirements.(a) Tangible net worth and bond.--A licensee must maintain the minimum tangible net worth and bond prescribed by this chapter at all times.(b) Records.--A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business, or other place of the licensee if agreed to by the department, the original or a copy of any books, accounts, records and documents or electronic or similar access thereto, of the business conducted under the license as prescribed by the department to enable the department to determine whether the business of the licensee is being conducted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. All instruments, documents, accounts, books and records relating to the virtual currency exchange business shall be kept separate and apart from the records of any other business conducted by the licensee. All records shall be preserved and kept available for investigation or examination by the department for a period of four years, unless otherwise determined by the department. The department shall have free access to and authorization to examine records maintained by the licensee. The costs of the examination, including travel costs, shall be borne by the licensee. The department may deny or revoke the authority to maintain records at another place for good cause in the interest of protection for Commonwealth consumers, including for the licensee's failure to provide books, accounts, records or documents to the department upon request.(c) Compliance with chapter.--A licensee shall maintain, implement and enforce policies and procedures to ensure compliance with all applicable Federal, State and local laws, rules and regulations. The policies and procedures shall be 20260HB2643PN3622 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reviewed and updated regularly and approved annually by the chief executive officer, chair of the board, executive board or equivalent internal governing body of the licensee. A licensee shall designate a compliance officer that is a full-time employee owning less than 20% of the licensee, who coordinates, monitors and conducts annual compliance review of compliance with all applicable Federal, State and local laws, rules and regulations.(d) Reports to department.--A licensee shall file periodically, as determined by the department, a report as prescribed by the department, setting forth information required by the department concerning the virtual currency kiosk business conducted by the licensee. Licensees who fail to file the required report at the date required by the department may be subject to a penalty of $100 for each day after the due date until the report is filed.(e) Permissible fees.--A licensee may charge to an individual for each transaction an aggregate fee of no more than the greater of $5 or 3% of the United States dollar equivalent of the transaction, inclusive of all fees, charges, sale price markups over market price, exchange spreads or any other fees or charges however delineated.(f) Daily transaction limits.--(1) A new customer shall be limited to the United States dollar equivalent of $500 in total transactions across all the licensee's virtual currency kiosks in a 24-hour period.(2) An existing customer shall be limited to the United State dollar equivalent of $1,000 in total transactions across all the licensee's virtual currency kiosks in a 24-hour period.20260HB2643PN3622 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Warnings and specific statements.--Prior to the initiation of any transaction, a virtual currency kiosk shall clearly and conspicuously display on the screen all of the following:(1) General warnings informing customers that: (i) The value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued willingness of market participants to exchange United States dollars for virtual currency which may result in the permanent and total loss of the value of a particular virtual currency if the market for that virtual currency disappears.(ii) The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency relative to United States dollars may result in a significant loss over a short period of time.(iii) Consumer fraud often starts with contact from a stranger, and the customer should never provide login credentials, wallet information, financial details, personal identification information, security verification details or remote access to anyone.(iv) Examples of the most common types of fraudulent scheme involving virtual currency kiosks.(2) The following specific statement:Virtual currency is not backed or insured by the government and accounts and value balances are not subject to protections of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union Administration, Securities Investor Protection Corporation or any other government agency.No legitimate organization will ever ask you to 20260HB2643PN3622 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deposit cash into a Virtual Currency ATM to resolve an issue, protect your money or protect loved ones.You should contact the virtual currency kiosk customer service helpline or State or local law enforcement if you have any uncertainty surrounding this transaction or suspect fraudulent activity.(h) Customer service.--A licensee shall provide consumers with access to customer service agents that are available during all hours in which the virtual currency kiosk is in operation and available to perform transactions at a toll-free number.(i) Government identification.--A virtual currency kiosk must require a customer to scan a government-issued identification prior to allowing the initiation of a transaction.(j) Receipt.--A virtual currency kiosk must provide a printed receipt in addition to an electronically provided receipt. The receipt must contain at a minimum:(1) The name and contact information of the licensee, including a toll-free telephone number for customer service.(2) The customer name and identification information from scanned government-issued identification.(3) The type, value, date and precise time of the transaction.(4) All fees charged, including those listed in sub section (e), individually labeled. (5) In the case of a new customer, and dependent upon how the licensee chooses to comply with subsection (k) , a statement of either:(i) "There is a 72-hour delay in execution of the transaction, and you have the right to cancel the 20260HB2643PN3622 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transaction within 72 hours"; or(ii) "You have the right to cancel the transaction within 72 hours."(6) A statement of the refund policy in compliance with subsection (l).(k) Cancellation.--A licensee shall wait 72 hours before processing a new customer's transactions or, at the licensee's expense, shall allow the new customer to cancel and receive a full refund for the transaction and fees.(l) Refunds.--If a customer has been fraudulently induced to engage in a virtual currency kiosk transaction, the licensee shall issue a full refund to include the transaction amount and all fees charged, if the customer contacts the licensee within 60 days after the date of the transaction with the customer's name, address, phone number, transaction receipt number and copy of the report from State or local law enforcement.(m) Disclosures on virtual currency kiosk.--Each licensed virtual currency kiosk must conspicuously display a unique NMLS identification number, department issued license number, the licensee's toll-free customer service number, transaction fee schedule and any additional information as prescribed by the department.§ 6305. Public education campaign.(a) Duties.--No later that one year after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall conduct a public education campaign to provide information to the general public and populations identified by the department as being particularly susceptible to virtual currency kiosk scams and frauds about virtual currency kiosks and fraudulent schemes involving their use. The public education campaign may include 20260HB2643PN3622 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public service announcements through television, radio, print media and the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents.--The department shall ensure that the public education campaign under this section includes the following information:(1) What a virtual currency kiosk is.(2) How a virtual currency kiosk operates.(3) Identifying and avoiding virtual currency kiosk scams and frauds.(4) How to report suspected virtual currency kiosk scams and frauds.(5) Providing examples of responsible behavior when engaging with virtual currency kiosks.(c) Fund.--The Virtual Currency Kiosk Public Education Campaign Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. The department shall administer the fund. During the time period in which the public education campaign is active, money in the fund shall be used to administer the public education campaign required under this section. After expiration of the public education campaign, money in the fund shall be deposited into the General Fund. Interest earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund and money in the fund shall not lapse at the end of a fiscal year.(d) Report.--No later than one year prior to the expiration of the public education campaign, the department shall submit a report on the public education campaign to the chair and minority chair of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include:20260HB2643PN3622 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A summary of the public education campaign.(2) An assessment of the public education campaign's performance and impact.(3) Recommendations on further action to achieve the public education goals of the campaign.(e) Expiration.--The public education campaign required under subsection (a) shall expire five years from the effective date of this subsection.§ 6306. Authority of department.(a) General authority.--The department shall have the authority to:(1) Examine any instrument, document, account, book, record or file of a licensee or any person having a connection to the licensee or make other investigation as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The department may remove any instrument, document, account, book, record or file of a licensee to a location outside of the licensee's office location. The costs of the examination shall be borne by the licensee or the entity subject to the examination.(2) Conduct administrative hearings on any matter pertaining to this chapter, issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of instruments, documents, accounts, books and records at any hearing. The instruments, documents, accounts, books and records may be retained by the department until the completion of all proceedings in connection with which the materials were produced. A department official may administer oaths and affirmations to a person whose testimony is required. In the event a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the 20260HB2643PN3622 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department or to testify on a matter concerning which the person may be lawfully interrogated, on application by the department, Commonwealth Court may issue an order requiring the attendance of the person, the production of instruments, documents, accounts, books and records and the giving of testimony.(3) Request and receive information or records of any kind, including reports of criminal history record information from any Federal, State, local or foreign government entity regarding an applicant, licensee or person related in any way to the business of the applicant or licensee, at a cost to be paid by the applicant or licensee.(4) Issue regulations, statements of policy or orders as may be necessary for the proper conduct of the virtual currency kiosk business by licensees, the issuance and renewal of licenses and the enforcement of this chapter.(5) Prohibit or permanently remove a person or licensee responsible for a violation of this chapter from working in the present capacity or in any other capacity of the person or licensee related to activities regulated by the department.(6) Order a person or licensee to make restitution for actual damages to consumers caused by a violation of this chapter.(7) Issue cease and desist orders that are effective immediately, subject to a hearing as specified under subsection (b) within 14 days of the issuance of the order.(8) Impose other conditions as the department deems appropriate.(b) Hearings.--A person aggrieved by a decision of the 20260HB2643PN3622 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may appeal the decision to the commission. The appeal shall be conducted under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(c) Injunctions.--The department may maintain an action for an injunction or other process against a person to restrain and prevent the person from engaging in an activity violating this chapter.(d) Final orders.--A decision of the commission or an order of the department that has not been appealed shall be a final order of the department and shall be enforceable in a court of competent jurisdiction. The department may publish final adjudications issued under this section, subject to redaction or modification to preserve confidentiality. The department shall regularly report violations of this chapter, enforcement actions and other relevant information to the NMLS.(e) Appeals.--A person aggrieved by a decision of the commission may appeal the decision under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 6307. Suspension, revocation or refusal.(a) Departmental action.--The department may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license issued under this chapter if any fact or condition exists or is discovered, which, if it had existed or had been discovered at the time of filing of the application for the license, would have warranted the department in refusing to issue the license or if a licensee or director, officer, partner, employee or owner of a licensee has:(1) Made a material misstatement in an application or any report or submission required by this chapter or department regulation, statement of policy or order.(2) Failed to comply with or violated a provision of 20260HB2643PN3622 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter or an regulation or order promulgated or issued by the department under this chapter.(3) Engaged in dishonest, fraudulent or illegal practices or conduct in a business or unfair or unethical practices or conduct in connection with the business.(4) Been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a crime of moral turpitude or felony.(5) Permanently or temporarily been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing conduct or a practice involving an aspect of the virtual currency kiosk business.(6) Become the subject of an order of the department denying, suspending or revoking a license applied for or issued under this chapter.(7) Become the subject of a United States Postal Service fraud order.(8) Failed to comply with the requirements of this chapter to make and keep records prescribed by regulation, statement of policy or order of the department, to produce records required by the department or to file financial reports or other information that the department by regulation, statement of policy or order may require.(9) Become the subject of an order of the department denying, suspending or revoking a license under the provisions of any other law administered by the department.(10) Demonstrated negligence or incompetence in performing an act for which the licensee is required to hold a license under this chapter.(11) Become insolvent, meaning that the liabilities of the applicant or licensee exceed the assets of the applicant 20260HB2643PN3622 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or licensee or that the applicant or licensee cannot meet the obligations of the applicant or licensee as they mature or is in such financial condition that the applicant or licensee cannot continue in business with safety to the customers of the applicant or licensee.(12) Failed to comply with the terms of an agreement under which the department authorizes a licensee to maintain records at a place other than the licensee's principal place of business.(b) Reinstatement.--The department may reinstate a license which was previously suspended, revoked or denied renewal if all of the following exist:(1) The condition which warranted the original action has been corrected to the department's satisfaction.(2) The department has reason to believe that the condition is not likely to occur again.(3) The licensee satisfies all other requirements of this chapter.§ 6308. Penalties.(a) Persons operating without licenses.--A person subject to the provisions of this chapter and not licensed by the department that violates a provision of this chapter or that commits an action which would subject a license to suspension, revocation or nonrenewal under section 6307 (relating to suspension, revocation or refusal) may be fined by the department for up to $10,000 for each offense.(b) Violation by licensee.--A person licensed under this chapter or director, officer, owner, partner, employee or agent of a licensee that violates a provision of this chapter or that commits an action which would subject the licensee to 20260HB2643PN3622 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suspension, revocation or nonrenewal under section 6307 may be fined by the department up to $10,000 for each offense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2643PN3622 - 22 - 123